ipjsua/Classes/View Contollers/Applications/Adobe Photoshop CC 2015/Adobe Photoshop CC 2015.app/Contents/Required/Linguistics/Providers/Plugins2/AdobeHunspellPlugin.bundle/Contents/SharedSupport/Dictionaries/lv_LV/hyph_lv_LV.dic
ci3ā2lism
ciā1li
ciā1lis
ci3ācija
1ciā2c
ciāci1j
cir3s1ta
ci2rs2
cir3s4tu
3cijā
ci1j
3ciju
ci1z
ci1ē
2c1d
2c1n
2c1k
2c1v
2c1g
1j
2j.
ja2s1
2j1b
jā3b
jās2
jā1l
jā1r
2js
j1l
3jus
jup1
3jo2s1
jop1
jok1
2j1p
j1ie1d
2j1c
2j1d
2j1n
2j1v
jē1
2j2š
īs1as2
ī1sa
1ī1sā
īs1ām
īs1s2
īs1l
īs1p2
īs1tā
īs1k2
īs1v
ī1l
ī2p2s2
ī1po
īp1r
īprak1
ī1pi
ī1r
ī2rē
ī2t1au
ī1ta
ī1tā
īt1ra
īt1ru
īt1ro
īt1rī
īdek1
ī1d
ī1z
ī1n
īn1o1ga
ī1no
ī2no1g
ī1ka
īks3mi
īks2
īk1s1ta
īk3ste.
īks1te
īk1s1tu
īks3tos2
īks1t2o
īk3sne.
īks1ne
īk1l
ī1va
ī1vā
ī1ve
ī1vi
ī1vī
ī1vē
ī1f
īg1s1t2o
ī2gs2
ī3gu
ī1ņ
ī1ž
ī1ļ
ī1ķ
ī2či
ī1č
1d
2d.
d2a1l
da1pr
3dar
da1is
2d1b
dā1f
2d1m
2ds2
d1s3a
3dsmitai
ds1mi
dsmi1ta
d3smita1j
d3smi1t2o
d1sp2
d1st
3de.
de1ā2
3des
de1le
de2p1r
de2n2s
denci1
den1c
2d1l
du1ā2
2dus1j
2d1os1t
do2l1i
do1l
2d1p
2dr
d1ra.
d1ras
dre2j
d1rot
d4roju
dro1j
3droju1mu
d1ri
d1rī1b
dū1
1d1ū1d
di1ā
di1l
di1o2ns
di1z
2d1d
d3dz
2d2z.
2dz1m
2d2z1s2
2dzoši
dz2o
dzo1š
2d2z1t
4dzinājum
dzi1nā
dzinā1j
2dz1c
2dz1j
2d2z1d
2dz1n
2d2z1k
2dz1v
2dz1š
2dz1g2
2d1n
3dnīca.
d1nī
dnī1c
2d1k
d1kā1
2d1ņ
d2ž
2z.
z2as
1zar
z1ai1c
z1a2c
1zan
zbil1
z1b
z1ā1lē
zār1
zā1z
z1m
2z1s2
z4s3trādi
zstrā1d
ze2b1
zes1
z1e2j.
ze1j
zej1ot
zek1
z1l
zle2
z1ur
z2o
z3op
1zon
z1p2
z1r
zraks3tu
zraks2
zraks3tīt
zraks1tī
zraks4tī2ts2
zraks3tī1j
1zū
2z1t
z1ie1š
1ziv
zcir2s3ts2
z1c
zci2rs2
zcirs3ti
2z1d
z3da
z3dā
z3du
z3do
z3dr
z1z
z1n
2z1k
z1vā
z1ve
z1vi
2z1ēn
z1g2
z1ņ
z1ž
2n.
1na
2n1at1t
nag1l
2n1b
1nā
nā1lā
nā1lo
nā1z
n1m
2ns
ns1po
nsp2
ns1t
n1s2ta
n1s2ti
n1ska
nsk2
ns1v
1ne
ne1m
ne1sl
ne1sn
ne1sv
ne1le
ne1o2
2ner1ģ
ne1tr
ne1i
neiz1
ne3j
ne3d
ne1z
ne1kr
ne1g
n1l
1nu
1no
no3a2
no1st
no1p
no1tr
n2o3d
no1k
nok2l
2no1g
no2gas
no1ga
3nogl
3no1gu
n1p
2n1r
nraks3
1nū
n1t
n2t2s3
n3ti
n2t2j
1ni
3nis
2n1ie1sa
3niek
ni1za
niē3
nciā3lo
n1c
1nī
3nīcas
nī1c
3nī1gā
3nī2gs2
nd1ra
n1d
n2dr
n3drī
n2dv
n1z
n1n
n1ka
n1kl
n1kr
nk2t
n1kta.
nk1ta
n1k1tā
n1v
nvā1
1nē
n1f
n2g2s3
n1ge
ng2l
n1glu
n1gr
n2gru
n3gru.
n1že
n1žu
n2ģ
1ka.
1kas
1kau1ta
2kau1d
ka1pe
kat1ra
kat1ri
1ka1j
1ka1v
3kaņo3ti
ka1ņo
1kā
kā1lā
kā1lo
kā1re2
kā1rī
kā1rē
kā2d1r
kā1d
kā1ž
k1m
ks2
ks4mos
ks3mo
k3smī1gā
ks1mī
k3smī3gu
k3smī1go
ks3l
ks4las
ks4lā
k1slām
ks1li
k1spa
ksp2
k1spe
ks3po
k1stam
ks1ta
k1stai
k4s2ts2
k1stur
ks1tu
k1sto.
ks1t2o
ks3tošo
ksto1š
ks3tr
k4s3tis
ks1ti
k1stin
k1stī.
ks1tī
ks3tī1b
k3stī2s.
k3stītāja
kstī1tā
kstītā1j
ks3tī3tus
kstī1tu
k3stī1t2o
k3stītie
kstī1ti
k3stīju.
kstī1j
k3stīšana.
kstī1š
kstīša1na
k1stēm
ks1tē
k1stē1š
ks3na
ks4ne1š
ks1ne
k3snešu
ks3ni
k1s1nī
ks3k2
ke1l
1ker
1ket
1klau
k1lā.
k1lām
1klā1j
1klū
k1l2i.
k1lē
1ku
ku1p
1ko
kok1sn
koks2
k1p
krak3s1ta
kraks2
kraks3tā
kraks3tu
krak3s1t2o
1krāt
k1rā1nu
1krit
2k1riš1ņu
kri2š
kri2š3ņ
1krī
k1h
1kūr
k3tam
k1ta
k1tā
ktu1ā
k1tu
k3t2o
kto1b1
k1tr
k1tū
k3tie
k1ti
1ki
k1n
k3ns
1k2nī
k1k
k1vā
k1ve
kš1au
k1š
k2š1v
k1g
k2ņa
4kļau1tī
1kļā
k1ļu.
1kļū
2v.
vas1p2
vas1k2
2v1b
vā1lā
vā1lo
vā1rī
2vs2
v1st
1ve.
ves1v
3vers3m
ve2rs2
2vert
1ve1d
2v1l
1vu
vu1ā
1vo
vok1l
2v1p
vpa4d1
2vr
v1re
v1ru
2v1t
viā3cija2s1
viā2c
viāci1j
vi2sa
vi2lie
vi1li
vi2da
vi1d
vi1z
2v1j
3vī1r
2v1d
2v1n
2v1k
2v1v
4vēroja1mi
vē1ro
vēro1j
1vē1j
ēs1l
ēs1tā
ē1l
ē1pa
ē1pā
ē1pe
ē1po
ē1pi
ē1pī
ē1ra
ē1rā
ēr1s4tu
ē2rs2
ēr1s1ti
ē1re
ē1ru
ē1ro
ēr3p2s.
ēr2ps2
ēr1pju
ērp1j
ērt2
ē1ri
ē1rī
ērk1š1
ē1rē
ē2r3g2
ē1tā
ēt1r
ē2t1ie1š
ē1ti
1ē2d.
ē1d
ē2d1v
ē2zu
ē1zi
ē2no
ē1ka
ēk1l
ēk3š
ē1v
ēg1l
ēg1ļ
ē1ņ
ē1žu
ē1ži
ē1ļa
ē1ļā
ē1ļu
ē1ķ
1š
2š.
2š1aiz
2š1m
2šs2
šsacīks3
š1sa
šsa1c
š1st
še2ja
še1j
2š1l
2š1up
2š1p
2š1r
šraks3ta
šraks2
3š2ru1tā
3š2ru1tu
šū1
2št
2š1c
2š1d
2š1z
2š1n
2š1k
2šv
š1va
š1vā
2š1g
2š2ņ
3š1ņa
š3ņu.
š1ņu
3šņus
2šļ
š1ļa
š1ļu
3šļu.
2š1ķo
2š1ķ2i.
1fa
fa2br
fa1b
fai1
fā1l
2fs
fe2b
fe2za
1fu
1fo
f1p
fra1s
f1t
1f2i.
1fis
1fi1j
fi1z
1fī
f1g
1ga
ga2br
ga1b
ga3la
g2al
ga1le
ga1p
g1ak
g2br
g1b
1gā
2g1m
2gs2
gs3mi
g1s1ta
g4stai
g1stā.
gs3tās
gs3tāk.
g2stāk
g1stu.
gs1tu
g3stu1ma
g3stu1mu
gs3toša.
gs1t2o
gsto1š
g3stošā
g3stoši
g1s1ti
g2s3tiem
gs3tī
g1sn
2g1e1ņ
g1las
gl1at
g1lā.
g1lās
g1lāk
g1lē
1gu
gu1ā
1go
2g1p
2g1ra1b
g1ra1j
3gravē2t.
gra1v
3gravē2ts2
1graf
g1rāl
g1rā1c
1grā2fs
3grāfijā
grā1fi
grā1fi1j
3grāfiju
g1rus
1gro
1gū
2gt
g1tā
1gi
gz2
g1z1n
g1n
gno2s
g1no
g1vā
g1ve
g1vi
1gē1
g1ž
1ņa
2ņ1b
1ņā
ņ1st
1ņe
ņ1ep
1ņu
ņuk1
1ņo
ņ1og1
2ņ1p
ņpa3dsmi1tā
ņpa1d
ņpa2ds2
ņpads1mi
2ņ1r
1ņi
2ņ1d
2ņ1n
2ņ1k
ņ1v
1ņē
ņ2š
2ņ1ģ
2ņ1ķ
1ža
1žā
ž1m
2žs
že1l
že3z
1žo
žo2k
2ž1r
1žis
ž1iz2
ži2z1s3
1žī
ž1z
ž1n
2ž1k
2ž1v
1žē
ž2ņ
ž3ņā
ž3ņi
ž1ļ
1ļa.
ļa1m1a
ļa1m1i
ļau4t2i.
ļau1ti
3ļautība
ļau1tī
ļautī1b
ļ1at
1ļai
ļ1ei
ļe2j
ļ1l
1ļus
1ļo
ļ1r
ļ1h
1ļi
1ļī
ļ1n
ļ1k
ļ1v
1ļē
ļ2š
ļ1f
ļ1g
ļ1ņ
ļ1ļ
ļ1ķ
ļ2ķa
1ģ
ģe1l
ģi1o2z1s2
ģio1z
2ģ1n
ķ1ak
1ķā
2ķs
ķes1
1ķu
1ķo
1ķ2i.
ķirs3t
ķi2rs2
1č
čak1
čes1
2č1t
čīk1
